Hawaii statutes.
§121-9 Adjutant general; duties. The
adjutant general shall perform such duties as are prescribed by law and such
other military duties consistent with the regulations and customs of the armed
forces of the United States as required by the governor.

The adjutant general shall supervise all of the
forces comprising the military components of the department of defense of the
State. The supervisory power shall include the command, discipline, training,
and recruiting of the armed forces of the State, military operations,
distribution of troops, inspections, armament, military education and
instruction, fiscal operations, administration, and supply.

The adjutant general is authorized to confer
the powers of police officers, including the power to arrest, to employees of
the department who are engaged as security guards for national guard and emergency
management facilities; provided that such powers shall remain in force and
effect only while the security guards are in the actual performance of their
duties as security guards. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS §121-9; am L 1969, c
249, §1; am L 1973, c 65, §1; gen ch 1985; L 2014, c 111, §28]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next